Missouri, session 2026, SB1037.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 192.021, to read as
follows:
192.021. 1. The department of health and senior
services shall be authorized to contract directly with a
designated Missouri affiliate of the National Network of
Public Health Institutes, or a similar or successor entity,
in order to assist in carrying out its duties to promote the
health and wellbeing of the residents of this state. Such
contracts may include, but not be limited to, efforts to
assist in the delivery of health services to residents
throughout the state and the administration of grant funds
and related programs.
2. Within sixty days after the end of each fiscal
year, the department and the designated affiliate shall
provide the general assembly with an annual report and
accounting of any appropriations and grant funds received
and expended by the designated affiliate pursuant to this
section during the immediate prior fiscal year and may
provide recommendations and suggestions for improvement in
services provided.
✓